Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Article 5. Science Museum of Virginia.

§ 23.1-3210.
Science Museum of Virginia established.

The Science Museum of Virginia (the Museum) is established as an educational institution of the Commonwealth and a public body and instrumentality for the dissemination of education. The exercise by the Museum of the powers conferred by this article is the performance of an essential governmental function.

History.

Code 1950, § 9-65.1, § 23-239; 1970, c. 466; 1977, c. 597; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-3211.
Board of trustees.

The Museum shall be governed by a board of trustees (the board) consisting of 15 members who shall be appointed by the Governor. At least one of the members shall be a member of the Virginia Academy of Science. All appointments are subject to confirmation by the General Assembly.

Members shall be appointed for terms of five years. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. No member is eligible to serve more than two consecutive five-year terms; however, a member appointed to serve an unexpired term is eligible to serve two consecutive five-year terms immediately succeeding such unexpired term.

No member shall receive a salary for his service on the board.

The board shall elect a chairman and a secretary from its membership and may elect a vice-chairman from its membership.

The board shall meet at such times as it deems appropriate.

Seven members of the board shall constitute a quorum for all purposes.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 9-65.4, 9-65.5, 9-65.6, 9-65.10, 9-65.11, §§ 23-243, 23-244, 23-245, 23-248, 23-249; 1970, c. 466; 1977, c. 597; 1980, c. 612; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-3212.
Duties of the board.

The board shall seek to:

Deepen our understanding of man and his environment;

Promote a knowledge of the scientific method and thus encourage objectivity in the everyday affairs of man;

Engage in instruction and research in the sciences in order to educate citizens of all ages in the concepts and principles of science and how these concepts and principles form the foundation upon which rests our technological society and its economy;

Use, subject to approval of the accredited educational affiliates concerned, Museum personnel in educational programs;

Motivate and stimulate young people to seek careers in science;

Encourage an understanding of the history of scientific endeavor;

Provide special facilities and collections for the study of the Commonwealth’s natural resources; and

Foster a love of nature and concern for its preservation.

History.

Code 1950, § 9-65.2, § 23-240; 1970, c. 466; 1977, c. 597; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-3213.
Powers of the board.

The board may:

Select sites for the Museum and its divisions and provide for the erection, care, and preservation of all property belonging to the Museum;

Appoint the director of the Museum (the director) and prescribe his duties and salary;

Establish policies for the operation of the Museum, including the kinds and types of instruction and exhibits, and the development of plans for expansion of the Museum;

Employ planning consultants and architects for any expansion of the Museum;

Acquire by purchase, gift, loan, or otherwise land necessary for exhibits, displays, and expansion of the Museum;

Enter into contracts for construction of physical facilities;

Adopt a seal;

Charge for admission to the Museum; and

On behalf of the Commonwealth and in furtherance of the purposes of the Museum, receive and administer gifts, bequests, and devises of property of any kind whatsoever and grants from agencies of the United States government and expend, or authorize the expenditure of, funds derived from such sources and funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the Museum.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 9-65.12, 9-65.14, §§ 23-250, 23-252; 1970, c. 466; 1972, c. 524; 1974, c. 124; 1977, c. 597; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-3214.
Agents and employees.

The director may engage or authorize the engagement of such agents and employees as may be needed in the operation and maintenance of the Museum, subject to the approval of the board.

History.

Code 1950, § 9-65.13, § 23-251; 1970, c. 466; 1977, c. 597; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-3215.
Annual report.

The board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and General Assembly on or before November 1 of each year. Such report shall be submitted as a report document as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website. Such report shall contain, at a minimum, the annual financial statements of the Museum for the fiscal year ending the preceding June 30.

History.

1977, c. 597, § 23-253; 1984, c. 734; 1985, c. 146; 2004, c. 650; 2016, c. 588.